District of Columbia statutes.
5-333.03

Purpose; scope.

This subchapter establishes the responsibilities of and procedures for the MPD relating to investigations and preliminary inquiries, including criminal intelligence investigations and inquiries, that may affect activities protected by the First Amendment. This subchapter does not apply to criminal investigations or inquiries that do not involve First Amendment activities.

Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-352, § 203, 52 DCR 2296